Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1097
School of cosmetology; license; requirements.

In order to be licensed as a school of cosmetology by the department, an applicant shall meet and present to the department evidence of meeting the following requirements:

(1) The proposed school shall be a fixed permanent structure or part of one;

(2) The proposed school shall have a contracted enrollment of at least ten full-time or part-time students;

(3) The proposed school shall contain at least three thousand five hundred square feet of floor space and facilities, staff, apparatus, and equipment appropriate to its projected enrollment in accordance with the standards established by rule and regulation; and

(4) The proposed school shall not have the same entrance as or direct access to a cosmetology salon, esthetics salon, or nail technology salon.

A school of cosmetology is not required to be licensed as a school of esthetics in order to provide an esthetics training program or as a school of nail technology in order to provide a nail technology training program.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 97;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 33;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,136;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 359;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 26.